Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB905.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Hotel and Lodging Industry Employee Verification Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Agency." An agency, department, board or commission of the Commonwealth or of a municipality that issues a license for purposes of operating a business in this Commonwealth."Department." The Department of Labor and Industry of the Commonwealth."Employ." To enter into an employer-employee relationship 12345678910111213141516171819 with an individual or to use a contract, subcontract or exchange with an individual to obtain labor."Employee." An individual who enters into an employer-employee relationship with an employer or into a contract, subcontract or exchange with an employer to provide labor."Employer." Any of the following with at least 150 guest rooms:(1) A hotel, motel, inn, guesthouse or other building that holds itself out by any means, including advertising, license, registration with any innkeeper's group, convention listing association, travel publication or similar association or with a government agency, as being available to provide overnight lodging or use of facility space for consideration to individuals seeking temporary accommodation.(2) A place that advertises to the public at large or any segment of the public that it will provide beds, sanitary facilities or other space for a temporary period to members of the public at large.(3) A place recognized as a hostelry."E-Verify program." The Internet-based program administered by the United States Department of Homeland Security and the United States Social Security Administration that allows employers to verify an employee's work-authorization status. The term includes any successor program."License." As follows:(1) A permit, certificate, approval, registration, charter or similar form of authorization that is required by law and issued by an agency for the purposes of:(i) operating a business in this Commonwealth; or(ii) conducting operations in the hotel and lodging 20250HB0905PN0946 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 industry.(2) The term includes articles of incorporation and domestic or foreign entity registrations under 15 Pa.C.S. (relating to corporations and unincorporated associations).(3) The term does not include a professional or occupational license or certificate granted to an individual to engage in a profession or trade."Subcontractor." A person regardless of tier, including a staffing agency, that supplies workers to an employer under a contract."Unauthorized employee." An employee who does not have the legal right or authorization under Federal law to work in the United States.Section 3. Prohibited employment.(a) Prohibition.--An employer may not knowingly employ an unauthorized employee.(b) Verification.--On and after the effective date of this subsection, an employer that hires an employee shall verify the employment eligibility of the employee through the E-Verify program and shall keep a record of the verification for the duration of the employee's employment or three years, whichever is longer.(c) Staffing agencies.--If a staffing agency supplies workers to multiple industries, subsections (a) and (b) shall only apply to workers supplied for the hotel and lodging industry.Section 4. Procedures, presumptions and defenses.(a) Complaint form.--The department shall develop and make available a complaint form for an individual to allege a violation of section 3(a).20250HB0905PN0946 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Complaint process.--(1) An individual may submit to the department a complaint about a violation of section 3(a) on the prescribed complaint form.(2) An individual who knowingly provides materially false information on the prescribed complaint form shall be subject to punishment under 18 Pa.C.S. § 4904 (relating to unsworn falsification to authorities).(3) The department may investigate complaints under this act.(4) Pursuant to an investigation of a complaint under this act, the department may:(i) Enter and inspect the place of business or place of employment of an employer in this Commonwealth at any reasonable time for the purpose of examining and inspecting records of the employer that in any way relate to compliance with this act.(ii) Copy any or all records as the department may deem necessary or appropriate.(iii) Require from an employer full and accurate statements in writing, at times that the department deems necessary, of the work authorization verification process for all employees in the employer's employment.(iv) Interrogate persons for the purpose of ascertaining whether an employer has complied with this act.(c) Duty to investigate.--Upon receipt of a complaint on the prescribed complaint form alleging that an employer knowingly employs an unauthorized employee, the department shall investigate whether the employer has violated section 3(a) if 20250HB0905PN0946 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 all the information required to complete the form has been provided, including the name of the individual filing the complaint.(d) Authority to investigate.--The department may investigate a complaint that is not submitted on the prescribed complaint form, including an anonymous complaint.(e) Prohibition.--The department may not investigate a complaint that is based solely on race, color or national origin.(f) Verification.--If the department investigates a complaint, the department shall verify the work authorization of the alleged unauthorized employee with the Federal Government under 8 U.S.C. § 1373(c) (relating to communication between government agencies and the Immigration and Naturalization Service). A Commonwealth or local official may not attempt to independently make a final determination on whether an unauthorized employee is authorized to work in the United States.(g) Notification and action.--If, after an investigation, the department determines that the alleged employee is an unauthorized employee, the department shall do all of the following:(1) For a first violation, the department shall issue a warning letter detailing the violation and informing the employer of the provisions of this act. The following apply:(i) Notwithstanding paragraph (2), a violation by an employer that occurs 10 years or more after a prior violation shall be deemed a first violation.(ii) The department may not issue a warning letter if the employer demonstrates that the employment 20250HB0905PN0946 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 eligibility of the unauthorized employee was verified in good faith through the E-Verify program in accordance with section 3(b).(iii) After the issuance of a warning letter, the employer shall verify in writing to the department within 10 business days that the employer has terminated the employment of each unauthorized employee in this Commonwealth. If the employer fails to provide the verification, the violation shall constitute a second violation, and the department shall make a referral to the Attorney General in accordance with paragraph (2).(iv) The employer may appeal the issuance of the warning letter under the provisions of 2 Pa.C.S. (relating to administrative law and procedure).(2) For a second or subsequent violation, the department shall refer the case to the Attorney General for enforcement. The Attorney General shall bring an action against the employer in the county where the unauthorized employee is or was employed by the employer. The Attorney General may not bring an action against an employer for a violation that occurred before the effective date of this paragraph.(h) Expedited action.--Upon docketing an action under this section, a court shall expedite the action, including assigning the hearing at the earliest practicable date.(i) Determination.--In determining whether an employee is an unauthorized employee, a court shall consider only the Federal Government's determination under 8 U.S.C. § 1373(c). The following apply:(1) The Federal Government's determination shall create a rebuttable presumption of the employee's status.20250HB0905PN0946 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) The court may take judicial notice of the Federal Government's determination and may request the Federal Government to provide automated or testimonial verification under 8 U.S.C. § 1373(c).(j) Rebuttable presumption.--Proof that the employer verified the employment authorization of an employee through the E-Verify program shall create a rebuttable presumption that an employer did not knowingly employ an unauthorized employee.(k) Affirmative defenses.--(1) For the purposes of this section, it shall be an affirmative defense if an employer demonstrates that the employer has complied in good faith with 8 U.S.C. § 1324a(b) (relating to unlawful employment of aliens). An employer shall be considered to have complied with 8 U.S.C. § 1324a(b), notwithstanding an isolated, sporadic or accidental technical or procedural failure to meet the requirements, if the employer establishes a good faith attempt to comply with 8 U.S.C. § 1324a(b).(2) An employer shall have an affirmative defense to a violation under section 3(a) if a subcontractor or a subcontractor responsible for a violation by another subcontractor has knowingly employed an unauthorized employee, provided that the contractor has done the following:(i) Required compliance with this act in the contract with the subcontractor, including providing for the termination of the contract upon court-ordered sanctions for a violation of this act by the subcontractor.(ii) Obtained written verification from the 20250HB0905PN0946 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subcontractor that the subcontractor is aware of the provisions of this act and is responsible for compliance.Section 5. Penalties and remedial orders.(a) Order.--Upon a finding of a violation under section 3(a) pursuant to an action brought by the Attorney General under this act, a court shall order all of the following:(1) The employer to terminate the employment of each unauthorized employee.(2) The employer to a three-year probationary period for each business location where an unauthorized employee performed work. During the probationary period, the employer:(i) shall file quarterly reports with the department of each new employee who is hired by the employer at the business location where an unauthorized employee performed work; and(ii) may not knowingly employ an unauthorized employee.(3) The employer, within five business days, to verify in writing to the department that the employer has terminated the employment of each unauthorized employee in this Commonwealth.(4) Agencies to suspend each license that is held by the employer if the employer fails to timely submit the verification. The following apply:(i) Each license that is suspended under this paragraph shall remain suspended until the employer complies.(ii) Each license shall be reinstated immediately by the appropriate agency upon filing the verification under paragraph (3).20250HB0905PN0946 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) A license that is subject to suspension under this paragraph shall include each license that is held by the employer specific to the business location where an unauthorized employee performed work. If the employer does not hold a license specific to the business location where an unauthorized employee performed work, the court shall order suspension of each license that is held by the employer pertaining to operations anywhere within this Commonwealth.(b) Duration.--(1) For a second violation of section 3(a), the court may order the agency to suspend each license described under subsection (a)(4) that is held by the employer for a period not to exceed 30 business days.(2) For a subsequent violation of section 3(a) or a violation occurring during a three-year probationary period under subsection (a)(2), the court shall order suspension for a term not less than one year up to the permanent revocation of each license.(c) Factors.--In determining whether to order suspension or the duration of a suspension, the court shall consider the following factors:(1) The number of unauthorized employees employed by the employer.(2) Any prior misconduct by the employer.(3) The degree of harm resulting from the violation.(4) Whether the employer made good faith efforts to comply with any applicable requirements.(5) The duration of the violation.(6) The role of the directors, officers or principals of 20250HB0905PN0946 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the employer in the violation.(7) Any other factor that the court deems appropriate.(d) Suspension and reinstatement fees.--Nothing in this act shall prohibit an agency from charging an applicable fee for the suspension or reinstatement of a license.Section 6. Protection from retaliation.(a) Prohibited conduct.--It shall be unlawful for an employer to discharge, threaten or otherwise retaliate or discriminate against an employee regarding compensation or other terms or conditions of employment because the employee:(1) participates in an investigation, hearing or inquiry held by the Secretary of Labor and Industry or any other governmental authority under this act; or(2) reports or makes a complaint regarding the violation of this act to an employer or governmental authority.(b) Actions.--(1) An employee who suffers retaliation or discrimination in violation of this section may bring an action in a court of common pleas in accordance with established civil procedures of this Commonwealth.(2) The action under paragraph (1) must be brought within three years from the date the employee knew of the retaliation or discrimination.(c) Relief.--If an employee prevails in an action commenced under this section, the employee shall be entitled to the following relief:(1) Reinstatement of the employee, if applicable.(2) Restitution equal to three times the amount of the employee's wages and fringe benefits calculated from the date of the retaliation or discrimination.20250HB0905PN0946 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) Reasonable attorney fees and costs of the action.(4) Any other legal and equitable relief as the court deems appropriate.Section 7. Immunity.An employer that relies in good faith on the E-Verify program to verify employment eligibility of new employees under this act shall have no liability to an individual who is not hired or who is discharged from employment if incorrect information has been provided to the employer.Section 8. Required information.(a) Duty of employer.--Upon hiring an employee, an employer shall provide to the employee information on the following:(1) The limitations on employment of minors under the act of October 24, 2012 (P.L.1209, No.151), known as the Child Labor Act, including the occupational restrictions for minors.(2) The prohibitions on hiring an individual who does not have the legal right or authorization under Federal law to work in the United States, in accordance with 8 U.S.C. § 1324a (relating to unlawful employment of aliens).(b) Duty of department.--The department may enforce the provisions of subsection (a).(c) Penalties.--(1) If the department determines that an employer has violated the requirements of subsection (a), the department shall issue a written warning to the employer.(2) If an employer fails to comply with the requirements of subsection (a) within 90 days of receiving the warning under paragraph (1), the employer commits a second violation and may be subject to a penalty of not more than $250.20250HB0905PN0946 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 9. Effective date.This act shall take effect in one year.20250HB0905PN0946 - 12 - 12